lexc/verb/enhuige5.lexc
LEXICON Case1
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
!+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
!+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3;

LEXICON Case3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae§n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae§n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae§n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§eo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§eo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§eo§tt                 #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§eo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§eo§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§eo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§eo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§eo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§eo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§eo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§eo§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§eo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§nék                #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§l          #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igea§            #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§eo§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerb3oe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3oe;

LEXICON Case3oe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae§n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae§n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae§n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeoue§t§igeoue§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo§tt                 #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeo§tt§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§nék                #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§l          #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igea§            #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§ae§§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeo§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerb3mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3mely;

LEXICON Case3mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§aemely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§aemely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§aemely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§aemely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§aemely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§aemely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§aemely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§aemely§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§aemely§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§aemely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo2mely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§aemely§n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§eomely§tt§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§eomely§tt§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§eomely§tt                 #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§eomely§tt§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§eomely§tt§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§eomely§tt§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§eomely§tt§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§eomely§tt§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§eomely§tt§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§eomely§tt§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§eomely§tt§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§eomely§tt§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§aemely§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§aemely§n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§aemely§n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§aemely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§aemely§n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§aemely§n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§aemely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§aemely§n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igeamely§§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§eomely§tt§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§aemely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb5
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep5;
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case6;

LEXICON Rep5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§eo§g§AA§t  Imper5;
                    Imper6;
